Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202055-604
Commission on Military and Veteran Affairs; expenses.

Members of the Commission on Military and Veteran Affairs shall receive no compensation for their services as members of the commission other than their salary, but shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 2016, LB754, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 49.